Colorado, session 2026A, HB1222.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration.
(1) The general assembly finds and declares that:
(a) The general assembly has an ongoing responsibility to review,
evaluate, and update the state tax code within constitutional limitations
-3- 1222

to ensure that the state code is effective, equitable, and aligned with
Colorado's priorities;
(b) (I) Recent changes in the federal tax code materially expanded
certain business-related deductions, including deductions related to
business interest expense, bonus depreciation, qualified production
property, and domestic research and experimental expenditures (business
deductions).
(II) The business deductions significantly reduce federal taxable
income without regard to a taxpayer's ability to pay or connection to
household economic security.
(c) (I) Colorado state income tax is determined based on the
amount of a person's federal taxable income.
(II) The material expansion of the federal business deductions
modified the computation of federal taxable income and so impacted
Colorado state income tax revenue.
(III) The net impact of the recent federal tax code modification to
the computation of federal taxable income was a reduction in state
income tax revenue.
(IV) The amount and availability of the family affordability tax
credit is determined in part by the amount of state income tax revenue.
(V) Therefore, by modifying the computation of federal taxable
income, the expansion of the business deductions impacted the amount
and availability of the family affordability tax credit.
(VI) At least in part due to the enactment of recent changes to the
federal tax code, the family affordability tax credit will not be available
for the 2026 state income tax year and will be available in a reduced
amount for income tax years 2027 and 2028.
-4- 1222

(d) (I) In establishing the family affordability tax credit, the
general assembly found and declared that:
(A) Colorado families struggle to afford many necessary goods
and services, such as child care, housing, and health care. Eighty-three
percent of Colorado parents worry that their children won't be able to
afford to live in the state in the future.
(B) Targeted tax credits are a proven tool to lift families out of
poverty. Research has shown that families that claim these types of tax
credits, such as the state and federal child tax credit and the state and
federal earned income tax credit, have better health, improved schooling
outcomes, and increased adult earning potential. As the cost of raising
children has increased, a family affordability tax credit is critical for the
well-being of many children and families across Colorado.
(C) According to the Institute on Taxation and Economic Policy,
"[t]o cut child poverty rates by half, the majority of states would require
a base credit value of between three thousand dollars and four thousand
five hundred dollars per child plus a twenty percent boost for young
children". When coupled with the state and federal earned income tax
credit and the state and federal child tax credit, the additional investment
provided by the family affordability tax credit would establish Colorado
as a national leader in equitable economic policy.
(D) Colorado is dealing with rising costs and funding shortfalls in
many areas across our state, and it is necessary to provide tax credits to
the people who need it most in a way that will do the most good.
Establishing the family affordability tax credit is a proven way to do that;
and
(E) By prioritizing the state's lowest-income households,
-5- 1222

expanding the child age eligibility, and including more families, the state
can provide research-backed investments for families. Through
thoughtful and strategic investment, Colorado can cut child poverty nearly
in half.
(II) Therefore, it is a priority of Colorado to provide a tax credit
that targets the same taxpayers that the family affordability tax credit
targeted, to offset the reduction in the family affordability tax credit.
(e) (I) This House Bill 26-1222 constitutes a single comprehensive
tax policy change that better aligns the state tax code with Colorado's
priorities by, at least partially, mitigating the modified federal income tax
code's effects on the family affordability tax credit by creating a tax credit
that targets the same population that the family affordability tax credit
targeted while also requiring taxpayers to add back to their taxable
income only the incremental income amounts attributable to the recent
expansion of the federal business deductions. The expanded business
deductions disproportionately benefit large and capital-intensive
businesses, while providing little or no direct benefit to low- and
moderate-income households, which households are particularly sensitive
to changes in tax policy and public investment. While Colorado's income
tax system is designed to conform to federal law generally, state law also
preserves the general assembly's authority to decouple from federal tax
provisions that undermine state fiscal stability, equity, or policy priorities.
This House Bill 26-1222 preserves the integrity of the state's commitment
to support low-income households, while maintaining long-standing
federal conformity for core income calculations and the state income tax
base.
(II) The income tax credit created in this House Bill 26-1222
-6- 1222

reduces state tax revenue in an amount equal to or greater than the
amount of state revenue gain attributable to the changes made in this
House Bill 26-1222;
(III) Any net district revenue gain resulting from the tax policy
change in this House Bill 26-1222 is incidental and de minimis; and
(IV) Therefore, consistent with the Colorado Supreme Court's
holding in TABOR Found. v. Reg'l Transp. Dist., 2018 CO 29, that a tax
policy change that causes either no net district tax revenue gain or a net
district tax revenue gain that is only incidental and de minimis does not
require voter approval under section 20 (4)(a) of article X of the state
constitution, this House Bill 26-1222 is not a tax policy change that
requires voter approval.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-22-104, add
(3)(v), (3)(w), (3)(x), (3)(y), and (4)(ff) as follows:
39-22-104. Income tax imposed on individuals, estates, and
trusts - single rate - report - tax preference performance statement
- legislative declaration - definitions - repeal.
(3) There shall be added to the federal taxable income:
(v) FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JANUARY
1, 2027, AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE FEDERAL DEDUCTION CLAIMED BY THE
TAXPAYER FOR THE INCOME TAX YEAR FOR BUSINESS INTEREST PURSUANT
TO SECTION 163 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE TO THE EXTENT THE
AMOUNT CLAIMED EXCEEDS THE AMOUNT THE TAXPAYER WOULD HAVE
BEEN ALLOWED TO CLAIM PURSUANT TO THE LIMITATION ON BUSINESS
INTEREST SET FORTH IN SECTION 163 (j) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE
WITHOUT REGARD TO ANY AMENDMENT BY PUB. L. 119-21;
(w) FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JANUARY
-7- 1222

1, 2027, AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE FEDERAL DEDUCTION CLAIMED BY THE
TAXPAYER FOR THE INCOME TAX YEAR FOR QUALIFIED PROPERTY
DEPRECIATION PURSUANT TO SECTION 168 (k) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE
CODE TO THE EXTENT THE AMOUNT CLAIMED EXCEEDS THE AMOUNT THE
TAXPAYER WOULD HAVE BEEN ALLOWED TO CLAIM PURSUANT TO SECTION
168 (k) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE WITHOUT REGARD TO ANY
AMENDMENT BY PUB. L. 119-21; EXCEPT THAT, THE TAXPAYER MAY
REDUCE THE AMOUNT OTHERWISE REQUIRED TO BE ADDED TO THE
TAXPAYER'S FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION
(3)(w) BY THE AMOUNT OF QUALIFIED PROPERTY DEPRECIATION THE
TAXPAYER WOULD HAVE BEEN ALLOWED TO CLAIM FOR THE INCOME TAX
YEAR WITH RESPECT TO THE SAME PROPERTY PURSUANT TO ANY SECTION
OTHER THAN SECTION 168 (k) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE WITHOUT
REGARD TO ANY AMENDMENT BY PUB. L. 119-21;
(x) FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JANUARY
1, 2027, AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE FEDERAL DEDUCTION CLAIMED BY THE
TAXPAYER FOR THE INCOME TAX YEAR FOR QUALIFIED PRODUCTION
PROPERTY DEPRECIATION PURSUANT TO SECTION 168 (n) OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE; EXCEPT THAT, THE TAXPAYER MAY REDUCE THE AMOUNT
OTHERWISE REQUIRED TO BE ADDED TO THE TAXPAYER'S FEDERAL
TAXABLE INCOME PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (3)(x) BY THE AMOUNT
OF QUALIFIED PRODUCTION PROPERTY DEPRECIATION THE TAXPAYER
WOULD HAVE BEEN ALLOWED TO CLAIM FOR THE INCOME TAX YEAR WITH
RESPECT TO THE SAME PROPERTY PURSUANT TO ANY SECTION OTHER THAN
SECTION 168 (k) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE WITHOUT REGARD TO
ANY AMENDMENT BY PUB. L. 119-21; AND
(y) FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JANUARY
-8- 1222

1, 2027, AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE FEDERAL DEDUCTION CLAIMED BY THE
TAXPAYER FOR THE INCOME TAX YEAR FOR DOMESTIC RESEARCH AND
EXPERIMENTAL EXPENDITURES PURSUANT TO SECTION 174A OF THE
INTERNAL REVENUE CODE; EXCEPT THAT, THE TAXPAYER MAY REDUCE
THE AMOUNT OTHERWISE REQUIRED TO BE ADDED TO THE TAXPAYER'S
FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (3)(y) BY THE
AMOUNT OF THE DEDUCTION THE TAXPAYER WOULD HAVE BEEN ALLOWED
TO CLAIM FOR THE INCOME TAX YEAR WITH RESPECT TO THE SAME
RESEARCH AND EXPERIMENTAL EXPENDITURES PURSUANT TO SECTION 174
OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE WITHOUT REGARD TO ANY AMENDMENT
BY PUB. L. 119-21.
(4) There shall be subtracted from federal taxable income:
(ff) (I) FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER
JANUARY 1, 2028, A TAXPAYER REQUIRED TO MAKE AN ADDITION TO
FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(v), (3)(w),
(3)(x), OR (3)(y) OF THIS SECTION, IS ALLOWED TO APPLY THE FOLLOWING
SUBTRACTIONS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION (4)(ff):
(A) AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO ONE-FIFTH OF THE CUMULATIVE
AMOUNT ADDED TO FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME AS REQUIRED BY
SUBSECTION (3)(v) OF THIS SECTION FOR EACH OF THE FIVE INCOME TAX
YEARS IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING THE INCOME TAX YEAR IN WHICH THE
ADDITION WAS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(v) OF THIS
SECTION;
(B) AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO ONE-TENTH OF THE CUMULATIVE
AMOUNT ADDED TO FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME AS REQUIRED BY
SUBSECTION (3)(w) OF THIS SECTION FOR EACH OF THE TEN INCOME TAX
YEARS IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING THE INCOME TAX YEAR IN WHICH THE
-9- 1222

ADDITION WAS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(w) OF THIS
SECTION;
(C) AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO ONE THIRTY-EIGHTH OF THE
CUMULATIVE AMOUNT ADDED TO FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME AS REQUIRED
BY SUBSECTION (3)(x) OF THIS SECTION FOR EACH OF THE THIRTY-EIGHT
INCOME TAX YEARS IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING THE INCOME TAX YEAR IN
WHICH THE ADDITION WAS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(x) OF
THIS SECTION; AND
(D) AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO ONE-FOURTH OF THE CUMULATIVE
AMOUNT ADDED TO FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME AS REQUIRED BY
SUBSECTION (3)(y) OF THIS SECTION FOR EACH OF THE FOUR INCOME TAX
YEARS IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING THE INCOME TAX YEAR IN WHICH THE
ADDITION WAS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(y) OF THIS
SECTION.
(II) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF EACH SUBTRACTION ALLOWED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTIONS (4)(ff)(I)(A), (4)(ff)(I)(B), (4)(ff)(I)(C), AND
(4)(ff)(I)(D) OF THIS SECTION FOR A TAXPAYER SHALL NOT EXCEED THE
CUMULATIVE AMOUNT ADDED TO FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME PURSUANT
TO EACH CORRESPONDING ADDITION REQUIRED BY SUBSECTIONS (3)(v),
(3)(w), (3)(x), AND (3)(y) OF THIS SECTION FOR THAT SAME TAXPAYER.
(III) THE SUBTRACTIONS ALLOWED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION
(4)(ff) APPLY AFTER THE APPLICATION OF THE OTHER SUBTRACTIONS
PROVIDED FOR IN THIS SUBSECTION (4), EXCEPT FOR THE SUBTRACTION
ALLOWED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(z) OF THIS SECTION. IF THE
AMOUNT OF THE SUBTRACTIONS ALLOWED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (4)(ff)
EXCEEDS A TAXPAYER'S FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME AS CALCULATED
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION WITHOUT REGARD TO THE SUBTRACTION
-10- 1222

ALLOWED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(z) OF THIS SECTION, THE AMOUNT
NOT SUBTRACTED FROM THE TAXPAYER'S FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION MAY BE CARRIED FORWARD AND USED AS A
SUBTRACTION FROM THE TAXPAYER'S FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME AS
CALCULATED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION WITHOUT REGARD TO THE
SUBTRACTION ALLOWED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(z) OF THIS
SECTION IN SUBSEQUENT YEARS FOR A PERIOD NOT TO EXCEED TEN YEARS
AND MUST BE APPLIED FIRST TO THE EARLIEST POSSIBLE INCOME TAX
YEAR. ANY SUBTRACTION REMAINING AFTER THE PERIOD IS NOT
REFUNDED OR CREDITED TO THE TAXPAYER.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 39-22-131 as
follows:
39-22-131. Family affordability credit - tax preference
performance statement - legislative declaration - definitions.
(1) (a) IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 39-21-304 (1), WHICH
REQUIRES EACH BILL THAT CREATES A NEW TAX EXPENDITURE TO INCLUDE
A TAX PREFERENCE PERFORMANCE STATEMENT AS PART OF A STATUTORY
LEGISLATIVE DECLARATION, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY HEREBY FINDS AND
DECLARES THAT THE PURPOSES OF THE INCOME TAX CREDIT CREATED IN
THIS SECTION ARE THE SAME AS THE FAMILY AFFORDABILITY TAX CREDIT:
TO SUBSTANTIALLY REDUCE CHILD POVERTY, MAKE COLORADO MORE
AFFORDABLE FOR FAMILIES, AND HELP FAMILIES AFFORD EXPENSES
ASSOCIATED WITH HAVING CHILDREN BY PROVIDING TAX RELIEF FOR
CERTAIN INDIVIDUALS.
(b) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND THE STATE AUDITOR, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT, SHALL MEASURE THE
EFFECTIVENESS OF THE INCOME TAX CREDIT CREATED IN THIS SECTION IN
-11- 1222

COMBINATION WITH THE FAMILY AFFORDABILITY TAX CREDIT AND, IN THE
SAME MANNER AS THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND THE STATE AUDITOR
MEASURE THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE FAMILY AFFORDABILITY TAX CREDIT
BY DETERMINING THE NUMBER OF COLORADO FAMILIES THAT, AFTER
CLAIMING A CREDIT PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION AND THE FAMILY
AFFORDABILITY CREDIT, NO LONGER FALL BELOW THE FEDERAL POVERTY
LEVEL IN THE TAX YEAR IN WHICH THEY CLAIMED THE CREDITS.
(2) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "CREDIT" MEANS THE CREDIT AGAINST INCOME TAX CREATED
IN THIS SECTION.
(b) "DEPARTMENT" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE.
(c) "ELIGIBLE CHILD" MEANS A QUALIFYING CHILD, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 152 (c) OF THE FEDERAL "INTERNAL REVENUE CODE OF 1986";
EXCEPT THAT THE AGE REQUIREMENTS ARE SET FORTH IN SUBSECTIONS
(3)(a)(I), (3)(a)(II), (3)(b)(I), AND (3)(b)(II) OF THIS SECTION.
(d) "FEDERAL POVERTY LEVEL" MEANS THE POVERTY LINE THAT
IS REQUIRED TO BE UPDATED ANNUALLY WITHIN THE FEDERAL POVERTY
GUIDELINES ADOPTED BY THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AND HUMAN SERVICES PURSUANT TO 42 U.S.C. SEC. 9902 (2).
(e) "INFLATION" MEANS THE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE CHANGE IN THE
UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF LABOR BUREAU OF LABOR STATISTICS
CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR DENVER-AURORA-LAKEWOOD FOR ALL
ITEMS PAID BY ALL URBAN CONSUMERS, OR ITS APPLICABLE SUCCESSOR
INDEX.
(f) "JOINT FILER ADJUSTED BASE INCOME" MEANS, FOR INCOME
TAX YEARS COMMENCING BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2034, AN AMOUNT OF
-12- 1222

ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT OF ADJUSTED GROSS
INCOME DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO SECTION
39-22-130 (7) TO BE NECESSARY FOR TWO RESIDENT INDIVIDUALS WHO
FILE A JOINT RETURN TO QUALIFY FOR THE FAMILY AFFORDABILITY TAX
CREDIT PURSUANT TO SECTION 39-22-130 FOR THE INCOME TAX YEAR
COMMENCING ON JANUARY 1, 2027.
(g) "SINGLE FILER ADJUSTED BASE INCOME" MEANS, FOR INCOME
TAX YEARS COMMENCING BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2034, AN AMOUNT OF
ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT OF ADJUSTED GROSS
INCOME DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO SECTION
39-22-130 (7) TO BE NECESSARY FOR A SINGLE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL WHO
FILES A SINGLE RETURN TO QUALIFY FOR THE FAMILY AFFORDABILITY TAX
CREDIT PURSUANT TO SECTION 39-22-130 FOR THE INCOME TAX YEAR
COMMENCING ON JANUARY 1, 2027.
(3) (a) IN ADDITION TO THE CHILD TAX CREDIT ALLOWED BY
SECTION 39-22-129 AND THE FAMILY AFFORDABILITY TAX CREDIT
ALLOWED BY SECTION 39-22-130, FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING
ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, A RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL WHO FILES A
SINGLE RETURN IS ALLOWED A CREDIT AGAINST THE INCOME TAXES
IMPOSED PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 22 FOR:
(I) EACH ELIGIBLE CHILD OF THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
FIVE YEARS OLD OR YOUNGER AT THE CLOSE OF THE INCOME TAX YEAR IN
AN AMOUNT DETERMINED BY STAFF OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(b) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) EACH ELIGIBLE CHILD OF THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL WHO IS SIX
YEARS OLD OR OLDER BUT LESS THAN SEVENTEEN YEARS OLD AT THE
CLOSE OF THE INCOME TAX YEAR IN AN AMOUNT THAT IS SEVENTY-FIVE
-13- 1222

PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT ALLOWED IN SUBSECTION (3)(a)(I) OF THIS
SECTION.
(b) IN ADDITION TO THE CHILD TAX CREDIT ALLOWED BY SECTION
39-22-129 AND THE FAMILY AFFORDABILITY TAX CREDIT ALLOWED BY
SECTION 39-22-130, FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER
JANUARY 1, 2027, TWO RESIDENT INDIVIDUALS WHO FILE A JOINT RETURN
ARE ALLOWED A FAMILY AFFORDABILITY TAX CREDIT AGAINST THE
INCOME TAXES DUE IMPOSED PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 22 FOR:
(I) EACH ELIGIBLE CHILD OF THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
FIVE YEARS OLD OR YOUNGER AT THE CLOSE OF THE INCOME TAX YEAR IN
AN AMOUNT DETERMINED BY STAFF OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(b) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) EACH ELIGIBLE CHILD OF THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL WHO IS SIX
YEARS OLD OR OLDER BUT LESS THAN SEVENTEEN YEARS OLD AT THE
CLOSE OF THE INCOME TAX YEAR IN AN AMOUNT THAT IS SEVENTY-FIVE
PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT ALLOWED IN SUBSECTION (3)(b)(I) OF THIS
SECTION.
(4) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION, FOR
INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, THE
CREDIT AMOUNTS IN:
(I) SUBSECTION (3)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION ARE REDUCED, BUT NOT
BELOW ZERO, BY AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO SIX AND EIGHT HUNDRED
SEVENTY-FIVE ONE-THOUSANDTHS PERCENT FOR EACH FIVE THOUSAND
DOLLARS BY WHICH A RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL'S ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME
EXCEEDS THE SINGLE FILER ADJUSTED BASE INCOME; AND
(II) SUBSECTION (3)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION ARE REDUCED, BUT NOT
BELOW ZERO, BY AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO SIX AND EIGHT HUNDRED
-14- 1222

SEVENTY-FIVE ONE-THOUSANDTHS PERCENT FOR EACH FIVE THOUSAND
DOLLARS BY WHICH TWO RESIDENT INDIVIDUALS' ADJUSTED GROSS
INCOME EXCEEDS THE JOINT FILER ADJUSTED BASED INCOME.
(b) FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JANUARY
1, 2028, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADJUST THE JOINT FILER ADJUSTED BASE
INCOME AND SINGLE FILER ADJUSTED BASE INCOME TO REFLECT INFLATION
FOR EACH INCOME TAX YEAR IN WHICH THE CREDIT DESCRIBED IN THIS
SECTION IS ALLOWED IF CUMULATIVE INFLATION SINCE THE LAST
ADJUSTMENT, WHEN APPLIED TO THE CURRENT LIMITS, RESULTS IN AN
INCREASE OF AT LEAST ONE THOUSAND DOLLARS WHEN THE ADJUSTED
LIMITS ARE ROUNDED TO THE NEAREST ONE THOUSAND DOLLARS.
(5) BEGINNING WITH THE QUARTERLY DECEMBER REVENUE
FORECAST THAT LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF PRESENTS IN DECEMBER OF
2027, AND FOR EACH DECEMBER REVENUE FORECAST THEREAFTER, AS
PART OF THE QUARTERLY DECEMBER REVENUE FORECAST, LEGISLATIVE
COUNCIL STAFF SHALL DETERMINE:
(a) FOR THE CURRENT INCOME TAX YEAR, A PROJECTION OF THE
NET AMOUNT OF REVENUE GAIN DIRECTLY ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE
CHANGES MADE IN THIS HOUSE BILL 26-1222, NOTWITHSTANDING THE
TAX CREDIT CREATED IN THIS SECTION;
(b) A DOLLAR AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT AVAILABLE PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTIONS (3)(a)(I) AND (3)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION, WHICH DOLLAR
AMOUNT MUST BE THE SAME FOR BOTH SUBSECTIONS (3)(a)(I) AND
(3)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION, SUCH THAT THE STAFF OF THE LEGISLATIVE
COUNCIL PROJECTS, FOR THE CURRENT STATE INCOME TAX YEAR, THAT
THE TOTAL DOLLAR AMOUNT OF CREDITS CLAIMED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (3) WILL EQUAL THE DOLLAR AMOUNT THAT STAFF OF THE
-15- 1222

LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL DETERMINE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(a) OF
THIS SECTION.
(6) NO LATER THAN TWO WEEKS BEFORE THE QUARTERLY
DECEMBER REVENUE FORECAST THAT LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF
PRESENTS IN DECEMBER OF 2028, AND EACH DECEMBER REVENUE
FORECAST THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DELIVER A REPORT TO
THE STAFF OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL THAT DESCRIBES THE REVENUE
GAIN DIRECTLY ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE CHANGES MADE IN THIS HOUSE
BILL 26-1222 FOR THE PREVIOUS INCOME TAX YEAR, NOTWITHSTANDING
THE TAX CREDIT CREATED IN THIS SECTION.
(7) IN THE CASE OF A PART-YEAR RESIDENT, THE CREDIT ALLOWED
UNDER THIS SECTION IS APPORTIONED IN THE RATIO DETERMINED UNDER
SECTION 39-22-110 (1).
(8) THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION IS NOT
CONSIDERED TO BE INCOME OR RESOURCES FOR THE PURPOSE OF
DETERMINING ELIGIBILITY FOR THE PAYMENT OF PUBLIC ASSISTANCE
BENEFITS AND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE BENEFITS AUTHORIZED UNDER STATE
LAW OR FOR A PAYMENT MADE UNDER ANY OTHER PUBLICLY FUNDED
PROGRAM.
(9) THE AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION
THAT EXCEEDS THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL'S INCOME TAXES DUE IS
REFUNDED TO THE INDIVIDUAL.
(10) THE DEPARTMENT IS AUTHORIZED AND ENCOURAGED TO
DEVELOP A MEANS OF REFUNDING THE CREDITS ALLOWED BY THIS SECTION
TO RESIDENT INDIVIDUALS WHO QUALIFY FOR THE CREDITS IN TWELVE
EQUAL MONTHLY REFUNDS RATHER THAN ANNUALLY.
(11) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 39-21-304 (4), THE CREDIT DOES
-16- 1222

NOT REPEAL AFTER A SPECIFIED PERIOD OF TAX YEARS.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-22-304, add
(2)(m), (2)(n), (2)(o), (2)(p), and (3)(u) as follows:
39-22-304. Net income of corporation - legislative declaration
- definitions - repeal.
(2) There shall be added to federal taxable income:
(m) FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JANUARY
1, 2027, AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE FEDERAL DEDUCTION CLAIMED BY THE
TAXPAYER FOR THE INCOME TAX YEAR FOR BUSINESS INTEREST PURSUANT
TO SECTION 163 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE TO THE EXTENT THE
AMOUNT CLAIMED EXCEEDS THE AMOUNT THE TAXPAYER WOULD HAVE
BEEN ALLOWED TO CLAIM PURSUANT TO THE LIMITATION ON BUSINESS
INTEREST SET FORTH IN SECTION 163 (j) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE
WITHOUT REGARD TO ANY AMENDMENT BY PUB. L. 119-21;
(n) FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JANUARY
1, 2027, AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE FEDERAL DEDUCTION CLAIMED BY THE
TAXPAYER FOR THE INCOME TAX YEAR FOR QUALIFIED PROPERTY
DEPRECIATION PURSUANT TO SECTION 168 (k) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE
CODE TO THE EXTENT THE AMOUNT CLAIMED EXCEEDS THE AMOUNT THE
TAXPAYER WOULD HAVE BEEN ALLOWED TO CLAIM PURSUANT TO SECTION
168 (k) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE WITHOUT REGARD TO ANY
AMENDMENT BY PUB. L. 119-21; EXCEPT THAT, THE TAXPAYER MAY
REDUCE THE AMOUNT OTHERWISE REQUIRED TO BE ADDED TO THE
TAXPAYER'S FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION
(2)(n) BY THE AMOUNT OF QUALIFIED PROPERTY DEPRECIATION THE
TAXPAYER WOULD HAVE BEEN ALLOWED TO CLAIM FOR THE STATE
INCOME TAX YEAR WITH RESPECT TO THE SAME PROPERTY PURSUANT TO
-17- 1222

ANY SECTION OTHER THAN SECTION 168 (k) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE
CODE WITHOUT REGARD TO ANY AMENDMENT BY PUB. L. 119-21;
(o) FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JANUARY
1, 2027, AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE FEDERAL DEDUCTION CLAIMED BY THE
TAXPAYER FOR THE INCOME TAX YEAR FOR QUALIFIED PRODUCTION
PROPERTY DEPRECIATION PURSUANT TO SECTION 168 (n) OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE; EXCEPT THAT, THE TAXPAYER MAY REDUCE THE AMOUNT
OTHERWISE REQUIRED TO BE ADDED TO THE TAXPAYER'S FEDERAL
TAXABLE INCOME PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2)(o) BY THE AMOUNT
OF QUALIFIED PRODUCTION PROPERTY DEPRECIATION THE TAXPAYER
WOULD HAVE BEEN ALLOWED TO CLAIM FOR THE STATE INCOME TAX YEAR
WITH RESPECT TO THE SAME PROPERTY PURSUANT TO ANY SECTION OTHER
THAN SECTION 168 (k) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE WITHOUT REGARD
TO ANY AMENDMENT BY PUB. L. 119-21;
(p) FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JANUARY
1, 2027, AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE FEDERAL DEDUCTION CLAIMED BY THE
TAXPAYER FOR THE INCOME TAX YEAR FOR DOMESTIC RESEARCH AND
EXPERIMENTAL EXPENDITURES PURSUANT TO SECTION 174A OF THE
INTERNAL REVENUE CODE; EXCEPT THAT, THE TAXPAYER MAY REDUCE
THE AMOUNT OTHERWISE REQUIRED TO BE ADDED TO THE TAXPAYER'S
FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2)(p) BY THE
AMOUNT OF THE DEDUCTION THE TAXPAYER WOULD HAVE BEEN ALLOWED
TO CLAIM FOR THE STATE INCOME TAX YEAR WITH RESPECT TO THE SAME
RESEARCH AND EXPERIMENTAL EXPENDITURES PURSUANT TO SECTION 174
OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE WITHOUT REGARD TO ANY AMENDMENT
BY PUB. L. 119-21.
(3) There shall be subtracted from federal taxable income:
-18- 1222

(u) (I) FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER
JANUARY 1, 2028, A TAXPAYER REQUIRED TO MAKE AN ADDITION TO
FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(m), (2)(n),
(2)(o), OR (2)(p) OF THIS SECTION, IS ALLOWED TO APPLY THE FOLLOWING
SUBTRACTIONS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION (3)(u):
(A) AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO ONE-FIFTH OF THE CUMULATIVE
AMOUNT ADDED TO FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME AS REQUIRED BY
SUBSECTION (2)(m) OF THIS SECTION FOR EACH OF THE FIVE STATE INCOME
TAX YEARS IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING THE STATE INCOME TAX YEAR IN
WHICH THE ADDITION WAS REQUIRED;
(B) AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO ONE-TENTH OF THE CUMULATIVE
AMOUNT ADDED TO FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME AS REQUIRED BY
SUBSECTION (2)(n) OF THIS SECTION FOR EACH OF THE TEN TAXABLE
YEARS IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING THE TAXABLE YEAR IN WHICH THE
ADDITION WAS REQUIRED;
(C) AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO ONE THIRTY-EIGHTH OF THE
CUMULATIVE AMOUNT ADDED TO FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME AS REQUIRED
BY SUBSECTION (2)(o) OF THIS SECTION FOR EACH OF THE THIRTY-EIGHT
STATE INCOME TAX YEARS IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING THE STATE INCOME
TAX YEAR IN WHICH THE ADDITION WAS REQUIRED; AND
(D) AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO ONE-FOURTH OF THE CUMULATIVE
AMOUNT ADDED TO FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME AS REQUIRED BY
SUBSECTION (2)(p) OF THIS SECTION FOR EACH OF THE FOUR STATE INCOME
TAX YEARS IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING THE STATE INCOME TAX YEAR IN
WHICH THE ADDITION WAS REQUIRED.
(II) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF EACH SUBTRACTION ALLOWED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTIONS (3)(u)(I)(A), (3)(u)(I)(B), (3)(u)(I)(C), AND
-19- 1222

(3)(u)(I)(D) OF THIS SECTION SHALL NOT EXCEED THE CUMULATIVE
AMOUNT ADDED TO FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME PURSUANT TO EACH
CORRESPONDING ADDITION REQUIRED BY SUBSECTIONS (2)(m), (2)(n),
(2)(o), AND (2)(p) OF THIS SECTION.
(III) THE SUBTRACTIONS ALLOWED IN THIS SUBSECTION (3)(u)
APPLY AFTER THE APPLICATION OF THE OTHER SUBTRACTIONS PROVIDED
FOR IN THIS SUBSECTION (3), EXCEPT FOR THE SUBTRACTION ALLOWED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(p) OF THIS SECTION. IF THE AMOUNT OF THE
SUBTRACTIONS ALLOWED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (3)(u) EXCEEDS A
TAXPAYER'S FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME AS CALCULATED PURSUANT TO
THIS SECTION WITHOUT REGARD TO THE SUBTRACTION ALLOWED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(p) OF THIS SECTION, THE AMOUNT NOT
SUBTRACTED FROM THE TAXPAYER'S FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION MAY BE CARRIED FORWARD AND USED AS A
SUBTRACTION FROM THE TAXPAYER'S FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME AS
CALCULATED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION WITHOUT REGARD TO THE
SUBTRACTION ALLOWED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(p) OF THIS
SECTION IN SUBSEQUENT YEARS FOR A PERIOD NOT TO EXCEED TEN YEARS
AND MUST BE APPLIED FIRST TO THE EARLIEST POSSIBLE INCOME TAX
YEAR. ANY SUBTRACTION REMAINING AFTER THE PERIOD IS NOT
REFUNDED OR CREDITED TO THE TAXPAYER.
SECTION 5. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
-20- 1222

within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-21- 1222